Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 1912XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 8 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0r. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 279.87 relating to the prohibition 4 on disciplinary action for the use of legal names, the use 5 of student names as listed in school registration forms 6 or records, and for the failure to use personal pronouns 7 in official communications in the same manner as a school 8 district. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Prohibition on disciplinary 10 action ââ use of legal names or names of record ââ failure to use 11 personal pronouns. 12 1. a. The board of directors of each school district shall 13 not take any disciplinary action against an employee of the 14 school district, a contractor hired by the school district, 15 or a student enrolled in the school district for addressing 16 other employees, contractors, or students using the employeeâs, 17 contractorâs, or studentâs legal name. 18 b. The board of directors of each school district shall 19 not take any disciplinary action against an employee of the 20 school district, a contractor hired by the school district, or 21 a student enrolled in the school district for addressing other 22 students using the studentâs name as it is listed in the school 23 districtâs registration forms or records. 24 2. The board of directors of each school district shall not 25 take any disciplinary action against an employee of the school 26 district, a contractor hired by the school district, or a 27 student enrolled in the school district for failing to disclose 28 or use any personal pronouns in the greeting or signature block 29 of any form of official communication, including letters, 30 forms, notes, or electronic mail. 31 3. An employee whose employment is terminated in violation 32 of this section may enforce this section through a civil action 33 under section 70A.29, subsection 3. 34 4. For purposes of this section, âdisciplinary actionâ 35 -1- LSB 1912XS (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 8 includes termination of employment or the contractual 1 relationship, suspension from employment or the contractual 2 relationship, demotion, expulsion from school, suspension from 3 school, detention, financial penalties, and written or verbal 4 reprimands. 5